src-fst-morphology-stems-pronouns.lexc.md
Na Forainmneacha Pearsanta 		- The Personal Pronouns (mé,tú, sé, sí..)
Na Forainmneacha Éiginnte 		- Indefinite Pronouns (ceachtar, cibé ...)
E. Uí Dhonnchadha

-(1) New Irish Grammar by The Christian Brothers  
-(2) Gramadach na Gaeilge agus Litriú na Gaeilge - An Caighdeán Oifigiúil
-(3) Foclóir Póca - An Gúm
-(4) Nuachúrsa Gaeilge na mBráithre Críostaí
-(5) Ó Dónaill Irish-English Dictionary
Pronominals - words which act like pronouns

**LEXICON Personal_Pronouns  ** 
Personal Pronouns

**mé+Pron+Pers+1P+Sg:mé				#;	 **  me
**tú+Pron+Pers+2P+Sg:tú				#;	 **  you

Emphatic/Contrastive Pronouns

this is not an independent pronoun - it accompanies an pronoun or noun

Indefinite Pronouns
Interrogative Pronouns (added Feb 05) 
removed Pro from cén as noun complement is needed unlike cé
also include Det Art Sg in det-lex for "a shonrú cén dáta" = which

Copular DEMONSTRATIVE  See also Determiners

PREPOSITIONAL PRONOUNS (CONJUGATED PREPOSITIONS)

**LEXICON Emph_sa			 **  Broad: 1S & 2S & 3S(Fem) & 2P

**LEXICON Emph_se			 **  Slender: 1S & 2S & 3S(Fem) & 2P

**LEXICON Emph_san		 **  Broad: 3S(Masc) & 3P

**LEXICON Emph_sean		 **  Slender: 3S(Masc) & 3P

**LEXICON Emph_e			 ** Br/Sl: 1P

**LEXICON Demonstrative  ** 

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-gle/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc)</small>
